Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF3992.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 123B.09, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. School board membership. new text begin (a) new text end The care, management, and control of independent districts is vested in a board of directors, to be known as the school board. The term of office of a member shall be four years commencing on the first Monday in January and until a successor qualifies. The membership of the board shall consist of six elected directors together with such ex officio member as may be provided by law. deleted text begin Thedeleted text end new text begin (b) Those districts with a six-member new text end board may submit to the electors at any school election the question whether the board shall consist of seven members. If a majority of those voting on the proposition favor a seven-member board, a seventh member shall be elected at the next election of directors for a four-year term and thereafter the board shall consist of seven members. new text begin (c) new text end Those districts with a seven-member board may submit to the electors at any school election at least 150 days before the next election of three members of the board the question whether the board shall consist of six members. If a majority of those voting on the proposition favor a six-member board instead of a seven-member board, three members instead of four members shall be elected at the next election of the board of directors and thereafter the board shall consist of six members. new text begin (d) Those districts with a six-member board and in which 1,000 or fewer students are enrolled on October 1 of the preceding calendar year may submit to the electors at any school election the question whether the board shall consist of five members. If a majority of those voting on the proposition favor a five-member board, only two members shall be elected at the next election of the board of directors for a four-year term and thereafter the board shall consist of five members. new text end new text begin (e) Those districts with a five-member board may submit to the electors at any school election at least 150 days before the next election of two members of the board the question whether the board shall consist of six members. If a majority of those voting on the proposition favor a six-member board instead of a five-member board, three members instead of two members shall be elected at the next election of the board of directors and thereafter the board shall consist of six members. new text end